Utah statutes.
53-6-205.   Completion of training course or passing of certificate examination required -- Persons affected.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a peace officer in this state must successfully complete the basic course at a certified academy, or successfully pass a state certification examination according to the requirements of Section 53-6-206, before that person can be certified.

(b)  A person may not exercise peace officer powers until certified.

(2)  Subsection (1) applies only to persons not previously certified and who receive their first employment appointment or election as a peace officer in this state on or after January 1, 1985.

